California, session 20252026, AB742.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 115.7 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:115.7. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, once the process to certify descendants of American slaves is implemented by the Bureau for Descendants of American Slavery pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15210) of Part 6 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code that confirms an individual’s status as a descendant of an American slave, each board shall expedite applications for applicants seeking licensure who are descendants of American slaves.(b) This section shall become operative on the date that the certification process for the descendants of American Slaves is implemented by the Bureau for Descendants of American Slavery pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15210) of Part 6 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(c) This section shall remain in effect only for four years from the date on which this section became operative, or until January 1, 2032, whichever is earlier, and as of that date is repealed.(d) This section shall become operative only if Senate Bill 518 of the 2025–26 Regular Session is enacted establishing the Bureau for Descendants of American Slavery.